New York, session 2025-2026, A6930.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 24-0513 to read as follows: 3 § 24-0513. Local freshwater wetlands pesticide prohibition. 4 1. A local government that has implemented a freshwater wetlands 5 protection law or ordinance in accordance with section 24-0501 of this 6 title may adopt a local law or ordinance to prohibit the application of 7 pesticides to wetlands it regulates; provided, however, that any such 8 law or ordinance shall not prohibit pesticide applications for the 9 control of invasive species identified pursuant to title 17 of article 9 10 of this chapter, pests of significant public health importance, noxious 11 weeds designated by the department as injurious to ecosystem health, or 12 for the protection of critical native plant species. 13 2. (a) The provisions of this section shall apply only to those 14 wetlands which are hydrologically connected to any reservoir, reservoir 15 stem, class A waterway or other source of public water supply. 16 (b) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit 17 or limit the use or application of pesticides used in farm operations as 18 defined in section three hundred one of the agriculture and markets law. 19 3. Any local law or ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall 20 take effect on the first day of January after it shall have been 21 adopted. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10703-03-5